lexc/noun/enhuin.lexc
!!!enhuin.lexc ín híd nyíl !!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§k§
§VV§   §ooez23§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oeoez21§ §oooe2§ 
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §oeoez24§ §JJ§ §Jnull§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam11;

LEXICON Poss
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam11;
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam11
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen11;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen11
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case11;

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case11
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^at    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam1;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE21§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE22§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE22§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE22§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE22§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE22§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik


LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
Basahíd AddNoun;
Basahíd:Basahid AddNoun1;
Jankahíd AddNoun;
Jankahíd:Jankahid AddNoun1;
Szamosborhíd AddNoun;
Szamosborhíd:Szamoshid AddNoun1;
Váldhíd AddNoun;
Váldhíd:Válhid AddNoun1;
acélhíd AddNoun;
acélhíd:acélhid AddNoun1;
agrárhíd AddNoun;
agrárhíd:agrárhid AddNoun1;
alumíniumhíd AddNoun;
alumíniumhíd:alumíniumhid AddNoun1;
anyaghíd AddNoun;
anyaghíd:anyaghid AddNoun1;
apáthíd AddNoun;
apáthíd:apáthid AddNoun1;
aranynyíl AddNoun;
aranynyíl:aranynyil AddNoun1;
azsúrnyíl AddNoun;
azsúrnyíl:azsúrnyil AddNoun1;
balnyíl AddNoun;
balnyíl:balnyil AddNoun1;
baromfivágóhíd AddNoun;
baromfivágóhíd:baromfivágóhid AddNoun1;
bekötőhíd AddNoun;
bekötőhíd:bekötőhid AddNoun1;
betonhíd AddNoun;
betonhíd:betonhid AddNoun1;
billenőhíd AddNoun;
billenőhíd:billenőhid AddNoun1;
borotvahíd AddNoun;
borotvahíd:borotvahid AddNoun1;
békehíd AddNoun;
békehíd:békehid AddNoun1;
cellulózhíd AddNoun;
cellulózhíd:cellulózhid AddNoun1;
csatornahíd AddNoun;
csatornahíd:csatornahid AddNoun1;
csodahíd AddNoun;
csodahíd:csodahid AddNoun1;
csonthíd AddNoun;
csonthíd:csonthid AddNoun1;
csónakhíd AddNoun;
csónakhíd:csónakhid AddNoun1;
cérnahíd AddNoun;
cérnahíd:cérnahid AddNoun1;
daruhíd AddNoun;
daruhíd:daruhid AddNoun1;
diszulfidhíd AddNoun;
diszulfidhíd:diszulfidhid AddNoun1;
dobogóhíd AddNoun;
dobogóhíd:dobogóhid AddNoun1;
dolomithíd AddNoun;
dolomithíd:dolomithid AddNoun1;
dróthíd AddNoun;
dróthíd:dróthid AddNoun1;
dzsungelhíd AddNoun;
dzsungelhíd:dzsungelhid AddNoun1;
egérnyíl AddNoun;
egérnyíl:egérnyil AddNoun1;
emlősvágóhíd AddNoun;
emlősvágóhíd:emlősvágóhid AddNoun1;
energianyíl AddNoun;
energianyíl:energianyil AddNoun1;
euróhíd AddNoun;
euróhíd:euróhid AddNoun1;
ezüsthíd AddNoun;
ezüsthíd:ezüsthid AddNoun1;
fahíd AddNoun;
fahíd:fahid AddNoun1;
fanyíl AddNoun;
fanyíl:fanyil AddNoun1;
felhajtóhíd AddNoun;
felhajtóhíd:felhajtóhid AddNoun1;
felvonóhíd AddNoun;
felvonóhíd:felvonóhid AddNoun1;
feszítőhíd AddNoun;
feszítőhíd:feszítőhid AddNoun1;
fogpiszkálóhíd AddNoun;
fogpiszkálóhíd:fogpiszkálóhid AddNoun1;
folyamhíd AddNoun;
folyamhíd:folyamhid AddNoun1;
forgóhíd AddNoun;
forgóhíd:forgóhid AddNoun1;
fronthíd AddNoun;
fronthíd:fronthid AddNoun1;
fájdalomnyíl AddNoun;
fájdalomnyíl:fájdalomnyil AddNoun1;
félnyíl AddNoun;
félnyíl:félnyil AddNoun1;
fényhíd AddNoun;
fényhíd:fényhid AddNoun1;
fölvonóhíd AddNoun;
fölvonóhíd:fölvonóhid AddNoun1;
függőhíd AddNoun;
függőhíd:függőhid AddNoun1;
füsthíd AddNoun;
füsthíd:füsthid AddNoun1;
garázsvágóhíd AddNoun;
garázsvágóhíd:garázsvágóhid AddNoun1;
gondolatnyíl AddNoun;
gondolatnyíl:gondolatnyil AddNoun1;
gyakorlóhíd AddNoun;
gyakorlóhíd:gyakorlóhid AddNoun1;
gyalogoshíd AddNoun;
gyalogoshíd:gyalogoshid AddNoun1;
gyermeknyíl AddNoun;
gyermeknyíl:gyermeknyil AddNoun1;
gyékényhíd AddNoun;
gyékényhíd:gyékényhid AddNoun1;
gyújtónyíl AddNoun;
gyújtónyíl:gyújtónyil AddNoun1;
gáthíd AddNoun;
gáthíd:gáthid AddNoun1;
gördítőnyíl AddNoun;
gördítőnyíl:gördítőnyil AddNoun1;
görgőhíd AddNoun;
görgőhíd:görgőhid AddNoun1;
hajdúhíd AddNoun;
hajdúhíd:hajdúhid AddNoun1;
hajszálhíd AddNoun;
hajszálhíd:hajszálhid AddNoun1;
hajóhíd AddNoun;
hajóhíd:hajóhid AddNoun1;
hashíd AddNoun;
hashíd:hashid AddNoun1;
hidrogénhíd AddNoun;
hidrogénhíd:hidrogénhid AddNoun1;
hordóhíd AddNoun;
hordóhíd:hordóhid AddNoun1;
háncshíd AddNoun;
háncshíd:háncshid AddNoun1;
háromszöghíd AddNoun;
háromszöghíd:háromszöghid AddNoun1;
híd AddNoun;
híd:hid AddNoun1;
húsvágóhíd AddNoun;
húsvágóhíd:húsvágóhid AddNoun1;
hőhíd AddNoun;
hőhíd:hőhid AddNoun1;
időnyíl AddNoun;
időnyíl:időnyil AddNoun1;
indiánhíd AddNoun;
irányítónyíl AddNoun;
irányítónyíl:irányítónyil AddNoun1;
jelzőnyíl AddNoun;
jelzőnyíl:jelzőnyil AddNoun1;
járóhíd AddNoun;
járóhíd:járóhid AddNoun1;
jégnyíl AddNoun;
jégnyíl:jégnyil AddNoun1;
karbonhíd AddNoun;
karbonhíd:karbonhid AddNoun1;
keresztesnyíl AddNoun;
keresztesnyíl:keresztesnyil AddNoun1;
kerékpárhíd AddNoun;
kerékpárhíd:kerékpárhid AddNoun1;
kirakóhíd AddNoun;
kirakóhíd:kirakóhid AddNoun1;
kormányhíd AddNoun;
kormányhíd:kormányhid AddNoun1;
kurzornyíl AddNoun;
kurzornyíl:kurzornyil AddNoun1;
kérdésnyíl AddNoun;
kérdésnyíl:kérdésnyil AddNoun1;
kötélhíd AddNoun;
kötélhíd:kötélhid AddNoun1;
közvágóhíd AddNoun;
közvágóhíd:közvágóhid AddNoun1;
lemezhíd AddNoun;
lemezhíd:lemezhid AddNoun1;
libidóhíd AddNoun;
libidóhíd:libidóhid AddNoun1;
léchíd AddNoun;
léchíd:léchid AddNoun1;
lóvágóhíd AddNoun;
lóvágóhíd:lóvágóhid AddNoun1;
megcsapolóhíd AddNoun;
megcsapolóhíd:megcsapolóhid AddNoun1;
mentőhíd AddNoun;
mentőhíd:mentőhid AddNoun1;
mozgatónyíl AddNoun;
mozgatónyíl:mozgatónyil AddNoun1;
márványhíd AddNoun;
márványhíd:márványhid AddNoun1;
mérőhíd AddNoun;
mérőhíd:mérőhid AddNoun1;
műhíd AddNoun;
műhíd:műhid AddNoun1;
nádhíd AddNoun;
nádhíd:nádhid AddNoun1;
orrhíd AddNoun;
orrhíd:orrhid AddNoun1;
papírhíd AddNoun;
papírhíd:papírhid AddNoun1;
pestisnyíl AddNoun;
pestisnyíl:pestisnyil AddNoun1;
pontonhíd AddNoun;
pontonhíd:pontonhid AddNoun1;
pálcikanyíl AddNoun;
pálcikanyíl:pálcikanyil AddNoun1;
reklámhíd AddNoun;
reklámhíd:reklámhid AddNoun1;
rádióhíd AddNoun;
rádióhíd:rádióhid AddNoun1;
segédhíd AddNoun;
segédhíd:segédhid AddNoun1;
sodronyhíd AddNoun;
sodronyhíd:sodronyhid AddNoun1;
struccvágóhíd AddNoun;
struccvágóhíd:struccvágóhid AddNoun1;
szamárhíd AddNoun;
szamárhíd:szamárhid AddNoun1;
szerelemnyíl AddNoun;
szerelemnyíl:szerelemnyil AddNoun1;
sziklahíd AddNoun;
sziklahíd:sziklahid AddNoun1;
szárnyhíd AddNoun;
szárnyhíd:szárnyhid AddNoun1;
szükséghíd AddNoun;
szükséghíd:szükséghid AddNoun1;
sóhíd AddNoun;
sóhíd:sóhid AddNoun1;
tartóhíd AddNoun;
tartóhíd:tartóhid AddNoun1;
tengelyhíd AddNoun;
tengelyhíd:tengelyhid AddNoun1;
tevevágóhíd AddNoun;
tevevágóhíd:tevevágóhid AddNoun1;
tudáshíd AddNoun;
tudáshíd:tudáshid AddNoun1;
térhíd AddNoun;
térhíd:térhid AddNoun1;
tűznyíl AddNoun;
tűznyíl:tűznyil AddNoun1;
vadhíd AddNoun;
vadhíd:vadhid AddNoun1;
vashíd AddNoun;
vashíd:vashid AddNoun1;
versenynyíl AddNoun;
versenynyíl:versenynyil AddNoun1;
világítóhíd AddNoun;
világítóhíd:világítóhid AddNoun1;
vámhíd AddNoun;
vámhíd:vámhid AddNoun1;
völgyhíd AddNoun;
völgyhíd:völgyhid AddNoun1;
zsiliphíd AddNoun;
zsiliphíd:zsiliphid AddNoun1;
Óhíd AddNoun;
Óhíd:Óhid AddNoun1;
áthidalóhíd AddNoun;
áthidalóhíd:áthidalóhid AddNoun1;
érchíd AddNoun;
érchíd:érchid AddNoun1;
ín AddNoun;
ín:in AddNoun1;
öbölhíd AddNoun;
öbölhíd:öbölhid AddNoun1;
ütőnyíl AddNoun;
ütőnyíl:ütőnyil AddNoun1;
